Illinois, session 104th, SB40.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 356z.15 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.15)7    Sec. 356z.15. Habilitative services for children.8    (a) As used in this Section, "habilitative services" means 9occupational therapy, physical therapy, speech therapy, and 10other services prescribed by the insured's treating physician 11pursuant to a treatment plan to enhance the ability of a child 12to function with a congenital, genetic, or early acquired 13disorder. A congenital or genetic disorder includes, but is 14not limited to, hereditary disorders. An early acquired 15disorder refers to a disorder resulting from illness, trauma, 16injury, or some other event or condition suffered by a child 17prior to that child developing functional life skills such as, 18but not limited to, walking, talking, or self-help skills. 19Congenital, genetic, and early acquired disorders may include, 20but are not limited to, autism or an autism spectrum disorder, 21cerebral palsy, and other disorders resulting from early 22childhood illness, trauma, or injury.23    (b) A group or individual policy of accident and health   SB0040 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 03298 BAB 13320 b1insurance or managed care plan amended, delivered, issued, or 2renewed after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 395th General Assembly must provide coverage for habilitative 4services for children under 19 years of age with a congenital, 5genetic, or early acquired disorder so long as all of the 6following conditions are met:7        (1) A physician licensed to practice medicine in all 8    its branches has diagnosed the child's congenital, 9    genetic, or early acquired disorder.10        (2) The treatment is administered by a licensed 11    speech-language pathologist, licensed audiologist, 12    licensed occupational therapist, licensed physical 13    therapist, licensed physician, licensed nurse, licensed 14    optometrist, licensed nutritionist, licensed social 15    worker, or licensed psychologist upon the referral of a 16    physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 17    branches.18        (3) The initial or continued treatment must be 19    medically necessary and therapeutic and not experimental 20    or investigational. 21    (b-5) For any child under 19 years of age with an early 22acquired disorder that is diagnosed as a speech-language 23disorder, including stuttering, the coverage required under 24this Section shall include rehabilitative services in addition 25to habilitative services. As used in this subsection, 26"rehabilitative services" means speech therapy that helps a   SB0040 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 03298 BAB 13320 b1child restore or improve skills and functions for daily living 2that have been lost or impaired. 3    (c) The coverage required by this Section shall be subject 4to other general exclusions and limitations of the policy, 5including coordination of benefits, participating provider 6requirements, restrictions on services provided by family or 7household members, utilization review of health care services, 8including review of medical necessity, case management, 9experimental, and investigational treatments, and other 10managed care provisions.11    (d) Coverage under this Section does not apply to those 12services that are solely educational in nature or otherwise 13paid under State or federal law for purely educational 14services. Nothing in this subsection (d) relieves an insurer 15or similar third party from an otherwise valid obligation to 16provide or to pay for services provided to a child with a 17disability.18    (e) Coverage under this Section for children under age 19 19shall not apply to treatment of mental or emotional disorders 20or illnesses as covered under Section 370 of this Code as well 21as any other benefit based upon a specific diagnosis that may 22be otherwise required by law.23    (f) The provisions of this Section do not apply to 24short-term travel, accident-only, limited, or specific disease 25policies.26    (g) Any denial of care for habilitative services shall be   SB0040 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 03298 BAB 13320 b1subject to appeal and external independent review procedures 2as provided by Section 45 of the Managed Care Reform and 3Patient Rights Act.4    (h) Upon request of the reimbursing insurer, the provider 5under whose supervision the habilitative services are being 6provided shall furnish medical records, clinical notes, or 7other necessary data to allow the insurer to substantiate that 8initial or continued medical treatment is medically necessary 9and that the patient's condition is clinically improving. When 10the treating provider anticipates that continued treatment is 11or will be required to permit the patient to achieve 12demonstrable progress, the insurer may request that the 13provider furnish a treatment plan consisting of diagnosis, 14proposed treatment by type, frequency, anticipated duration of 15treatment, the anticipated goals of treatment, and how 16frequently the treatment plan will be updated. 17    (i) Rulemaking authority to implement this amendatory Act 18of the 95th General Assembly, if any, is conditioned on the 19rules being adopted in accordance with all provisions of the 20Illinois Administrative Procedure Act and all rules and 21procedures of the Joint Committee on Administrative Rules; any 22purported rule not so adopted, for whatever reason, is 23unauthorized. 24    (j) An insurer may not deny or refuse to provide otherwise 25covered services under a group or individual policy of 26accident and health insurance or a managed care plan solely   SB0040 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 03298 BAB 13320 b1because of the location wherein the clinically appropriate 2services are provided. 3(Source: P.A. 102-322, eff. 1-1-22.) 4    Section 10. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 5amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)7    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 8health service organizations shall be subject to the 9provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 10141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 11154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 12355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 13356z.10, 356z.15, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 14356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 15356z.54, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 16356z.71, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 364.3, 368a, 401, 401.1, 17402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and 18Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, and 19XXVI of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section 20shall require a limited health care plan to cover any service 21that is not a limited health service. For purposes of the 22Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and 23Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 24organizations in the following categories are deemed to be   SB0040 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 03298 BAB 13320 b1domestic companies:2        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or3        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 4    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 5    of this State, except a corporation subject to 6    substantially the same requirements in its state of 7    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 8    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.9(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 10102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-731, eff. 111-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, 12eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 13102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 141-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 15eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 16103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 177-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, 18eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 19    Section 15. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 20adding Section 5-5j as follows: 21    (305 ILCS 5/5-5j new)22    Sec. 5-5j. Speech-language rehabilitative and habilitative 23services. Subject to federal approval, for services beginning 24on and after July 1, 2025, the medical assistance program   SB0040 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 03298 BAB 13320 b1shall provide coverage for medically necessary rehabilitative 2and habilitative services for individuals under the age of 21 3with an early acquired disorder that is diagnosed as a 4speech-language disorder, including stuttering. As used in 5this subsection, "rehabilitative services" means speech 6therapy that helps an individual restore or improve skills and 7functions for daily living that have been lost or impaired. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92025, except that Sections 5 and 10 take effect on January 1, 102027.